Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 3. DEPARTMENT FUNDS, FEES, AND TAXES

SUBTITLE B. INSURANCE PREMIUM TAXES

CHAPTER 227. DISPOSITION OF PROCEEDS OF CERTAIN PREMIUM TAXES

Sec. 227.001. DISPOSITION OF TAX PROCEEDS. (a) The proceeds of the taxes imposed under Chapter 221, 222, 224, or 226 shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund.

(b) An amount equal to one-fourth of the proceeds deposited under Subsection (a) shall be transferred to the credit of the foundation school fund.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 2005.